Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 35A.63.100 and 2018 c 302 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:After approval of the comprehensive plan in accordance with provisions of this chapter, the legislative body, in developing the municipality and in regulating the use of land, may implement or give effect to the comprehensive plan or parts thereof by ordinance or other action to such extent as the legislative body deems necessary or appropriate. Such ordinances or other action may provide for:(1) Adoption of an official map and regulations relating thereto designating locations and requirements for one or more of the following: Streets, parks, public buildings, and other public facilities, and protecting such sites against encroachment by buildings and other physical structures.(2)(a)(i) Dividing the municipality, or portions thereof, into appropriate zones within which specific standards, requirements, and conditions may be provided for regulating: The use of public and private land, buildings, and structures; the location, height, bulk, number of stories, and size of buildings and structures; size of yards, courts, and open spaces; density of population; ratio of land area to the area of buildings and structures; setbacks; area required for off-street parking; protection of access to direct sunlight for solar energy systems; and such other standards, requirements, regulations, and procedures as are appropriately related thereto.(ii) Eliminating the minimum gross floor area requirements for single-family detached dwellings or reducing the requirements below the minimum performance standards and objectives contained in the state building code.(iii) Permitting the use of kit homes which have been constructed in a factory and designed to sufficient life, health, and safety standards to be utilized as emergency housing provided that the municipality adopts by ordinance or other actions a process for inspecting the kit homes at least every five years to ensure they meet sufficient life, health, and safety standards to be utilized as housing. For the purpose of this section, "kit homes" means any structures intended for residential use that are comprised of prefabricated walls, floors, and roofs which are assembled on-site and are 800 square feet or smaller in size.(b) The ordinance encompassing the matters of this subsection (2) is hereinafter called the "zoning ordinance." No zoning ordinance, or amendment thereto, shall be enacted by the legislative body without at least one public hearing, notice of which shall be given as set forth in RCW 35A.63.070. Such hearing may be held before the planning agency or the board of adjustment or such other body as the legislative body shall designate.(3) Adoption of design standards, requirements, regulations, and procedures for the subdivision of land into two or more parcels, including, but not limited to, the approval of plats, dedications, acquisitions, improvements, and reservation of sites for public use.(4) Scheduling public improvements on the basis of recommended priorities over a period of years, subject to periodic review.(5) Such other matters as may be otherwise authorized by law or as the legislative body deems necessary or appropriate to effectuate the goals and objectives of the comprehensive plan or parts thereof and the purposes of this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35.63 RCW to read as follows:(1) Cities may site kit homes in any zones or areas that allow single-family or other residential uses as well as in any other limited development space for the intention of providing emergency housing. Kit homes may be permitted for a limited time provided that the city adopts by ordinance or other actions a process for inspecting the kit homes at least every five years to ensure they meet sufficient life, health, and safety standards to be utilized as housing.(2) For the purpose of this section, "kit homes" means any structures intended for residential use that are comprised of prefabricated walls, floors, and roofs which are assembled on-site and are 800 square feet or smaller in size.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW to read as follows:(1) Counties may permit kit homes in zones or areas designated residential for the intention of providing emergency housing. In areas not zoned for permanent housing, but in which emergency housing is needed, counties may permit either the construction or placement, or both, of kit homes. Kit homes may be permitted for a limited time provided the county adopts by ordinance or other actions a process for inspecting the kit homes at least every five years to ensure they meet sufficient life, health, and safety standards to be utilized as housing.(2) For the purpose of this section, "kit homes" means any structures intended for residential use that are comprised of prefabricated walls, floors, and roofs which are assembled on-site and are 800 square feet or smaller in size.--- END ---